Wisconsin, session 2025, SB365.
do enact as follows:SB365,11Section 1. 25.40 (1) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB365,2,8225.40 (1) (a) 3. Revenues collected under ss. 341.09 (2) (d), (2m) (a) 1., (4), and 3(7), 341.14 (2), (2m), (6) (d), (6m) (a), (6r) (b) 2., (6w), and (8), 341.145 (3), 341.147 4(3), 341.16 (1) (a) and (b), (2), (2e), and (2m), 341.17 (8), 341.19 (1), 341.25, 341.255 5(1), (2) (a), (b), and (c), and (5), 341.26 (1), (2), (2m) (am) and (b), (3), (3m), (4), (5), 6and (7), 341.264 (1), 341.265 (1), 341.266 (2) (b) and (3), 341.268 (2) (b) and (3), 7341.269 (2) (b), 341.30 (3), 341.305 (3), 341.308 (3), 341.36 (1) and (1m), 341.51 (2), 8and 342.14 that are pledged to any fund created under s. 84.59 (2).SB365,29Section 2. 84.59 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB365,3,81084.59 (2) (b) The department may, under s. 18.562, deposit in a separate and 11distinct special fund outside the state treasury, in an account maintained by a 12trustee, revenues derived under ss. 341.09 (2) (d), (2m) (a) 1., (4), and (7), 341.14 (2), 13(2m), (6) (d), (6m) (a), (6r) (b) 2., (6w), and (8), 341.145 (3), 341.147 (3), 341.16 (1) (a) 14and (b), (2), (2e), and (2m), 341.17 (8), 341.19 (1), 341.25, 341.255 (1), (2) (a), (b), and 15(c), and (5), 341.26 (1), (2), (2m) (am) and (b), (3), (3m), (4), (5), and (7), 341.264 (1), 16341.265 (1), 341.266 (2) (b) and (3), 341.268 (2) (b) and (3), 341.269 (2) (b), 341.30 17(3), 341.305 (3), 341.308 (3), 341.36 (1) and (1m), 341.51 (2), and 342.14 and from 18any payments received with respect to agreements or ancillary arrangements 1entered into under s. 18.55 (6) with respect to revenue obligations issued under this 2section. The revenues deposited are the trustee’s revenues in accordance with the 3agreement between this state and the trustee or in accordance with the resolution 4pledging the revenues to the repayment of revenue obligations issued under this 5section. Revenue obligations issued for the purposes specified in sub. (1) and for the 6repayment of which revenues are deposited under this paragraph are special fund 7obligations, as defined in s. 18.52 (7), issued for special fund programs, as defined in 8s. 18.52 (8).SB365,39Section 3. 341.147 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 341.147 (1) (intro.) and 10amended to read:SB365,3,1411341.147 (1) (intro.) The Subject to sub. (1m), the owner of a fleet of 10 or more 12vehicles that are automobiles or motor trucks with a gross weight of not more than 138,000 pounds or that are a combination of any of the following may upon application 14register the fleet of vehicles under this section.:SB365,415Section 4. 341.147 (1) (a) of the statutes is created to read:SB365,3,1716341.147 (1) (a) Motor trucks with a gross weight of not less than 8,001 pounds 17nor more than 54,000 pounds.SB365,518Section 5. 341.147 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB365,3,2019341.147 (1) (b) Truck tractors or road tractors with a gross weight of not less 20than 4,500 pounds nor more than 54,000 pounds.SB365,621Section 6. 341.147 (1) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB365,3,2222341.147 (1) (c) Trailers with a gross weight of not more than 80,000 pounds.SB365,723Section 7. 341.147 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB365,4,21341.147 (1m) No vehicle registered under s. 341.264, 341.30, or 341.305 or 2that may be registered under s. 341.26 may be registered under this section.SB365,83Section 8. 341.147 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB365,4,124341.147 (2) Upon receipt of an application and the initial registration fees, the 5department shall issue registration plates of a distinctive design with the word 6“Fleet” embossed displayed on the plate for all of the vehicles in the fleet. 7Notwithstanding s. 341.13 (1), the department may not require the placement of an 8annual registration decal on a registration plate under this subsection. The 9department shall provide, to the extent feasible, the same registration expiration 10date for each vehicle in a fleet. A vehicle may be registered as part of a fleet under 11this section regardless of whether, at the time of application for the initial 12registration of the fleet, the vehicle is currently registered with the department.SB365,913Section 9. 341.25 (1) (gd) of the statutes is amended to read:SB365,4,1914341.25 (1) (gd) For each trailer or semitrailer having a gross weight of 3,000 15pounds or less and used for hire or rental, a fee which is one-half of the fee 16prescribed for a motor truck of the same maximum gross weight. The maximum 17gross weight shall be determined in the same manner as for a motor truck. A trailer 18under this paragraph which is part of a fleet of 100 or more trailers used for hire or 19rental may be registered under s. 341.308.SB365,1020Section 10. 341.25 (1) (ge) of the statutes is amended to read:SB365,5,421341.25 (1) (ge) For each trailer or semitrailer having a gross weight of more 22than 3,000 pounds but not more than 12,000 pounds designed to be hauled by a 23motor vehicle other than a truck tractor and not coming within the provisions of s. 24341.264, a fee which is one-half of the fee prescribed for a motor truck of the same 1maximum gross weight. The maximum gross weight shall be determined in the 2same manner as for a motor truck. A trailer under this paragraph having a gross 3weight of 4,500 pounds or less and used for hire or rental and which is part of a fleet 4of 100 or more trailers used for hire or rental may be registered under s. 341.308.SB365,115Section 11. 341.308 of the statutes is repealed.SB365,126Section 12. Effective date.SB365,5,87(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 10th month beginning after 8publication.SB365,5,99